huv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<v%>                ! Verbo
%<a%>                ! Adjetivo
%<det%>                ! Determinante
%<col%>              ! Colectivo
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%>                   ! Frontera de morfema

! (COLECTIVO) - RAIZ
! RAIZ
! DET - (PL)
LEXICON Root

Colectivo    ;
Determinante ;
Adjetivos ;
Nombres ;
Verbos ;

LEXICON Colectivo

%<col%>:%>mon Nombres-Humanos ; ! "Colectivo"
Nombres-Humanos ;

LEXICON Plural
%<pl%>:%>üw #; ! "Plural"
# ;

LEXICON Nombres-Humanos
ndok%<n%>:ndok # ; ! “Pescador”

LEXICON Nombres
pet%<n%>:pet # ; ! “Perro”
jow%<n%>:jow # ; ! “Hamaca”
müx%<n%>:müx # ; ! “Cayuco”

LEXICON Verbos

xomb%<v%>:xomb # ; ! "Encontrar"
jaw%<v%>:jaw # ; ! "Ver"
mb%<v%>:mb # ; ! "Ir"
joj%<v%>:joj # ; ! "Toser"

LEXICON Adjetivos
napat%<adj%>:napat # ; ! "Bravo"
napak%<adj%>:napak # ; ! "Duro"
naxix%<adj%>:naxix # ; ! "Sabroso"
nambeor%<adj%>:nambeor # ; ! "Negro"


LEXICON Determinante
aaga%<det%>:aaga Plural ; ! "El"
